Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB942.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Auditor 1234567891011121314151617181920 General Employee Qualification Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certified fraud examiner." An individual who has satisfied the requirements of the Association of Certified Fraud Examiners to become a certified fraud examiner."Certified public accountant." As defined in the act of May 26, 1947 (P.L.318, No.140), known as the CPA Law."Department." The Department of the Auditor General of the Commonwealth."Forensic audit." An examination of an entity's financial information with the purposes of determining if the entity's financial information is accurate and lawful."Fraud audit." An examination of an entity's financial information for the purposes of proving or disproving whether fraudulent activity has occurred."Qualified forensic auditor." An individual who is a certified public accountant and a certified fraud examiner."Qualified fraud auditor." A certified fraud examiner."State agency." An office, department, authority, board or commission of the executive branch.Section 3. Auditor qualifications.Department employees conducting an audit shall be adequately qualified to conduct the type of audit involved. Employees shall possess the following qualifications:(1) Employees conducting forensic audits shall be qualified forensic auditors.(2) Employees conducting fraud audits shall be qualified 20250SB0942PN1061 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fraud auditors.Section 4. New department employees.An employee hired by the department after the effective date of this section may not conduct audits or participate in the auditing process of audits for which the employee is not qualified under section 3.Section 5. Current department employees.A department employee hired prior to the effective date of this section shall be permitted to continue conducting the same type of audits which the employee conducted prior to the effective date of this section.Section 6. Employee certification.(a) Department policy.--The department shall develop a policy encouraging an employee to obtain the proper certification necessary to conduct an audit which the employee's job requires. The policy shall:(1) Direct an employee to the resources necessary to obtain a certification under section 3.(2) Include provisions that allow the department to collaborate with an employee to ensure that the employee has adequate time and resources to complete a certification.(b) Financial incentives.--The department shall provide financial incentives for an employee who becomes certified in order to assist the employee with the cost of continued professional education.Section 7. Forensic audits.(a) Department forensic audits.--The department may perform a forensic audit on financial information related to Federal and State funding sources if any of the following occur:(1) A forensic audit is requested by a State agency. The 20250SB0942PN1061 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department may appoint a qualified forensic auditor not currently employed by the Commonwealth to perform the forensic audit, and the requesting State agency shall be responsible for the cost incurred by the performance of the forensic audit.(2) The department receives an indication, when lawfully performing an audit on an entity, that sufficient records or information are not available to complete the audit.(3) A forensic audit is requested by the Governor, the chairperson or minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate or the chairperson or minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(b) Forensic audit results.--(1) The department shall provide the results of a forensic audit to the Governor and to each member of the General Assembly.(2) If the results contain evidence of suspected criminal activity, the department shall provide the results to the Office of Attorney General.Section 8. Fraud audits.(a) Department fraud audits.--The department may perform a fraud audit on financial information related to Federal and State funding sources if any of the following occur:(1) A fraud audit is requested by a State agency. If requested by a State agency, the department may appoint a qualified fraud auditor not currently employed by the Commonwealth to perform the fraud audit, and the requesting State agency shall be responsible for the cost incurred in the performance of the fraud audit.20250SB0942PN1061 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The department receives an indication, when lawfully performing an audit on an entity, that fraudulent activity or other criminal activity may have occurred.(3) A fraud audit is requested by the Governor, the chairperson or minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate or the chairperson or minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(b) Fraud audit results.--(1) The department shall provide the results of a fraud audit to the Governor and to each member of the General Assembly.(2) If the results contain evidence of suspected criminal activity, the department shall provide the results to the Office of Attorney General.Section 9. Committee standards.When conducting audits, the department may use, as a guide, the standards and best practices specified by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission.Section 10. Authority to issue subpoenas.(a) Issuance.--The Auditor General may issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, accounts, papers, records, documents, files, electronic records and electronic files and may examine the witnesses and documents. Issuance of subpoenas shall not prevent or repeal other powers granted under law to the Auditor General.(b) Service of subpoenas.--A subpoena issued under subsection (a) may be served by the Auditor General, the Attorney General or a sheriff of the county where the person or persons reside. Subpoenas may be served in person or by 20250SB0942PN1061 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certified mail.(c) Enforcement.--If a person or entity fails to comply with a subpoena issued under subsection (a), the Auditor General, the Attorney General or a representative of the Auditor General or Attorney General may file a petition to enforce the subpoena with Commonwealth Court or a court of record. The court may issue an order holding a person or entity in contempt for failure to comply with the subpoena and order the production of books, accounts, papers, records, documents and files within no later than 10 days of the order.(d) Confidentiality.--Information gathered through the subpoena power under this section shall be exempt from access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, from the department and may not be disclosed by the department absent an order from Commonwealth Court or other court of record.Section 11. Construction.Nothing in this act may be construed to prohibit the department from performing its obligations under the laws of this Commonwealth.Section 12. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0942PN1061 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122